Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 414. ENFORCEMENT OF COMPLIANCE AND PRACTICE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 414.002. MONITORING DUTIES. (a) The division shall monitor for compliance with commissioner rules, this subtitle, and other laws relating to workers' compensation the conduct of persons subject to this subtitle. Persons to be monitored include:

(1) persons claiming benefits under this subtitle;

(2) employers;

(3) insurance carriers;

(4) attorneys and other representatives of parties; and

(5) health care providers.

(b) The division shall monitor conduct described by Sections 415.001, 415.002, and 415.003 and refer persons engaging in that conduct to the division of hearings.

(c) The division shall monitor payments made to health care providers on behalf of workers' compensation claimants who receive medical services to ensure that the payments are made on time as required by Section 408.027.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.260, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 414.003. COMPILATION AND USE OF INFORMATION. (a) The division shall compile and maintain statistical and other information as necessary to detect practices or patterns of conduct by persons subject to monitoring under this chapter that:

(1) violate this subtitle, commissioner rules, or a commissioner order or decision; or

(2) otherwise adversely affect the workers' compensation system of this state.

(b) The commissioner shall use the information compiled under this section to impose appropriate penalties and other sanctions under Chapters 415 and 416.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.261, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 414.004. PERFORMANCE REVIEW OF INSURANCE CARRIERS. (a) The division shall review regularly the workers' compensation records of insurance carriers as required to ensure compliance with this subtitle.

(b) Each insurance carrier, the carrier's agents, and those with whom the carrier has contracted to provide, review, or monitor services under this subtitle shall:

(1) cooperate with the division;

(2) make available to the division any records or other necessary information; and

(3) allow the division access to the information at reasonable times at the person's offices.

(c) The insurance carrier, other than a governmental entity, shall pay the reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, of an auditor who audits the workers' compensation records at the office of the insurance carrier.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 414.005. INVESTIGATION UNIT. (a) The division shall maintain an investigation unit to conduct investigations relating to:

(1) alleged violations of this subtitle, commissioner rules, or a commissioner order or decision, with particular emphasis on violations of Chapters 415 and 416; and

(2) alleged offenses under this subtitle, with particular emphasis on offenses under Chapter 418.

(b) As often as the commissioner considers necessary, the commissioner or the investigation unit may review the operations of a person regulated by the division, including an agent of the person performing functions regulated by the division, to determine compliance with this subtitle.

(c) The review described by Subsection (b) may include on-site visits to the person's premises. The commissioner is not required to announce an on-site visit in advance.

(d) During an on-site visit, a person regulated by the division shall make available to the division all records relating to the person's participation in the workers' compensation system.

(e) The commissioner by rule shall prescribe the procedures to be used for both announced and unannounced on-site visits authorized under this section, including specifying the types of records subject to inspection.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.262, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (H.B. 2605), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 463 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 414.006. REFERRAL TO OTHER AUTHORITIES. (a) For further investigation or the institution of appropriate proceedings, the division may refer the persons involved in a case subject to an investigation to other appropriate authorities, including licensing agencies, district and county attorneys, or the attorney general.

(b) The division may provide technical or litigation assistance regarding the investigation referred under Subsection (a) to the appropriate authority.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.263, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 463 (H.B. 2053), Sec. 2, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 414.007. MEDICAL REVIEW. The division shall review information concerning alleged violations of this subtitle regarding the provision of medical benefits, commissioner rules, or a commissioner order or decision, and, under Sections 414.005 and 414.006 and Chapters 415 and 416, may conduct investigations, make referrals to other authorities, and initiate administrative violation proceedings.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.264, eff. September 1, 2005.